Utah statutes.
17C-1-203.   Agency board -- Quorum.

(1)  The governing body of an agency is a board consisting of the current members of the legislative body of the community that created the agency.

(2)  A majority of board members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of agency business.

(3)  An agency board may not adopt a resolution, pass a motion, or take any other official board action without the concurrence of at least a majority of the board members present at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

(4)  The mayor of a municipality operating under a council-mayor form of government, as defined in Section 10-3b-102:

(a)  serves as the executive director of an agency created by the municipality; and

(b)  exercises the executive powers of the agency.

